District of Columbia statutes.
6-1031

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Housing and Community Development Reform Advisory Commission Act of 2002”.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1141, 49 DCR 6968
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 6-1031 to 6-1037, see §§ 1141 to 1147 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).